Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Part 2

Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act

24-9-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.”

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

Law Reviews.

How to Act During a Deposition (Daniel C. Headrick), 48 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2012).

24-9-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Foreign jurisdiction” means a state other than Tennessee;

“Foreign subpoena” means a subpoena issued under authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, federally recognized Indian tribes, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

“Subpoena” means a document, however denominated, issued under authority of a court of record requiring a person to:

Attend and give testimony at a deposition;

Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or

Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

24-9-203. Issuance of subpoena.

A party may submit a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the county in which discovery is sought to be conducted in this state. The request for and issuance of a subpoena in this state under this part shall not constitute making an appearance in the courts of this state.

When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in this state, the clerk, in accordance with the rules of court, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed. The subpoena shall incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena and contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

Law Reviews.

How to Act During a Deposition (Daniel C. Headrick), 48 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2012).

24-9-204. Service of subpoena.

A subpoena issued by a clerk of court under §24-9-203 shall be served in compliance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure relative to service of process.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

24-9-205. Deposition, production, and inspection.

When a subpoena issued under §24-9-203 commands a person to attend and give testimony at a deposition, produce designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things, or permit inspection of premises, the time and place and the manner of the taking of the deposition, the production, or the inspection must comply with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure relative to discovery.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

Law Reviews.

How to Act During a Deposition (Daniel C. Headrick), 48 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2012).

24-9-206. Application to court.

An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under §24-9-203 shall comply with the applicable rules or statutes of this state and be submitted to the court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.

24-9-207. Award of attorney's fees and expenses.

If the court grants a motion to modify or quash a subpoena issued pursuant to this part, the court, in its discretion, may award the party subpoenaed its reasonable attorney's fees and expenses incurred in defending against the subpoena. A final order of the court awarding attorney's fees and expenses shall have the status of a judgment entitled to full faith and credit under the constitution of the United States. If the court sustains the subpoena as issued, the court in its discretion may award the prevailing party its reasonable attorney's fees and expenses.

Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 908, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 1, 2008.